src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
![a|o|i|u] (%^RV:) Cns:+ _ (%^SV:)   %^EA:    ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:)          ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; remove LC i due to sijvo : siijvon, not *siijvun 
   [a|o|u] (%^RV:) Cns:+ _ (%^SV:)   %^EA:    ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:)          ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;
     :Vow (%^RV:) Cns:+ _ (%^SV:)               %^WG:          (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;


!!€ tohhi2>đ
!!€ tuhhi>đ

!!€ lo^RVh^RCá^WG^VHIGH^RLEN>im
!!€ luuv0á000>im

! Trond this fails xxx
! h o:u ^RV:0 r t t e:i > i:j n
! ho^RVrtte
! hu0rttijn

! Rule "Adjective illative in -vân after u" fails:
! #:0 h o:u ^RV:0 r t t e:i HERE ---> 0:j 0:n #:0



!! ### ä rules

"Monophthongisation rule iä:ee 1"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
i:e <=> _ ä:  Cns:* i                      %^WG:                      %> i: ;   !! 1)
        _ ä:  Cns:* Vow: Cns [%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:] %^WG: ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) [%>|.#.] ; !! 2)viäskár veeskir iäbbár eebir 
        _ ä:e Cns:+ u           (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: %^RLEN:           [%>|.#.] ; !! estuđ

"iä:e rule 1 and second syllable Fleeting vowel before suffix"        
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  Note: many rules in one
i:0 <=> \Vow: _ ä: Cns:+ i2:i                              %>    [i|i3:i|Cns] ; !! 1)  i:0 for iđ C verbs 
        \Vow: _ ä: Cns:+ u2:u                              %>   ;               !! 2)  i:0 for uđ C verbs
        \Vow: _ ä: Cns:+ u     (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.] ;            !! melluu
         Cns: _ i  t: t: %^CLEN: (%^RLEN:) %^SLEN: %> m   ;                     !! 4) cokkiitt%^CLEN%^RLEN%^SLEN%>mân



"iä:e and iä:ee rule 2 and Diphthongisation i5ä to ie"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
ä:e <=> i:  _ Cns:+  i          %^WG:                %> i: ; ! RV 
        i:e _ Cns:+  i          %^WG: %^RLEN:        %> i: ;  ! RV 
        i:e _ Cns:+ :i Cns:     %^ÁI: %^WG: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV  !viäskár%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN
        i:  _ Cns:+ u2:u                             %>  ;  ! RV 
        i5: _ Cns:  Cns:+ á: s [%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:] %^WG: [%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:] [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV  !viäkk4ás : viehis
        i5: _ Cns:+ u2:u       Triggers:*           [%>|.#.] ;  !! estuđ ki5äptu2 > kieptuđ
   [i5:|i:] _ Cns:+ u          (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV  ! estuđ

!!€ vi5äh^RCu^WG^CLEN^VBACK>u
!!€ vievvu000>u

!!€ siämmu2>đ>
!!€ s0emmu>đ>




"Different rules for ä:a, first vowel (or only vowel)"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  čääci:čassijn, läbži:labžijn lään^RCi%>id
ä:a <=>      _ [ä:|%^RV:] Cns:+ [i|â|a|á|o|u2:] (Cns:+)  ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.|#] ; ! RV 
             _ [ä:|%^RV:] Cns:+ [i2:|:i]   (%^WG:)  ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:])            %> [i:|i3:] ;  ! RV 
             _ [ä:|%^RV:] Cns:+ [i2:|:i]    %^WG:   [%^CLEN:|%^RLEN: ]  (%^SVLOW:) %> i: ;  ! RV !čääci:čassijn
             _     %^RV:  Cns:+ :i    %^WG:            %^RLEN:               %> i: ; ! RV  !ä%^RVi4gi%^WG%^RLEN%>id
             _ ä:0        Cns:+ Vow:         %^WG:   %^CLEN:  %^RVSH:        %> i:  ; ! RV !! čääci : čassijn
             _ ä:a        Cns:+ i2:i                                         %> [i|i3:i|Cns]  ;  ! RV  !cntrV
       \Vow: _            Cns:+ i2:i                                         %> [i|i3:i|Cns]  ; ! RV   !cntrV
             _ [ä:|%^RV:] Cns:+ a  (%^WG:|%^CSH:)          (%^RVSH:)        [%>|.#.|#]  ; 
             _ ä:         Cns:+ i      (%^WG:|%^CSH:)    %^VBACK: (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.|#]   ;  !! OBS ^EA -> VHIGH?
       \Vow: _ ä:         Cns:+ Vow:   (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.|#] ; ! RV 


!!€ njääh^RCi^WG^VBACK>i3
!!€ njaav0i00>i

! Trond this fail xxx
! k ä:a ^RV:0 v n â ^WG:0 ^VBACK:0 # s k y e t:0 t4:t
! kä^RVvnâ^WG^VBACK#škyett4
! ka0vnâ00#škye0t


"ää to aa, second vowel"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  á:o in pairs like kuátij -> koođij, säämi -> saamij čäällu%^VBACK%>m lään^RCi%>id
ä:a   <=> ä:  _ Cns:+ :i                         ( %^WG:)                            %> i:  ; 
          ä:a _ Cns:+ :i                         %^WG: %^RLEN:                       %> i:  ; 
          ä:a _ Cns:+ :i   Cns:            %^ÁI: %^WG: %^RLEN:                      [%>|.#.] ; !! viäskár:veeskir viäskár%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN
          ä:  _ Cns:+ i2:i                                                           %> [i|i3:i|Cns] Sgm:*  ; 
          ä:  _ Cns:+ a                                 ([%^WG:|%^CSH:])            [%>|.#.] ;  
          ä:  _ Cns:+ â                         ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^VBACK:)  [%>|.#.|#] ;
! Erstatte förre linje med neste löyser problemet čaävâ#škyet under, men yaml går ned frå 75 til 117. 
!          ä:  _ Cns:+ â                         ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.|#] ;
          ä:  _ Cns:+ [i|u]                   ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;  
          ä:a _ Cns:+ [Vow: - u2:]              %^WG: (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:            [%>|.#.] ;  
          ä:  _ Cns:+ â [l|d|[s|t:][t4:|t:]]  ([%^WG:|%^CSH:|%^CLEN:]) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) %> ;
          ä:a _            Cns:+ [i|i2:|u2:u] ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; !! paaccim čaallum
!         ä:a _ Cns:+   â       l   (%^CSH:)  %^RLEN:  (%^SLEN:)         %>   ;  ! cntrV trond

! Trond this fails xxx
! č ä:a ä:a h:v ^WG:0 ^VBACK:0 ^RVSH:0
! čäähâ^WG^VBACK^RVSH#škyett4
! čaavâ000#škye0t



"ää to áá and á0 in Illative and Sg3"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  ... for säämi > sáámán
ä:á <=> \Vow      _   :á   Cns:+ :á  [%^EA:|%^EX:] (%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:)  (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ; !! :á  XXX
        \Vow   ä: _        Cns:+ :á  [%^EA:|%^EX:] (%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:)  (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ; 
        \Vow      _   ä:  Cns:+ Vow: [%^EA:|%^EX:] (%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:)   %^RVSH:  [%>|.#.]  ; !! sámásis
   [.#.|#|Cns]    _  %^RV: Cns:+ :á  [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) [%>|.#.]  ; !! njálmásis

! del 2, warum...
       \Vow       _   :á   Cns:+ :Vow              (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: (%^RLEN:)  [%>|.#.] ; !! :á
       \Vow    ä: _        Cns:+ [:Vow - u2: ]     (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: (%^RLEN:)  [%>|.#.] ; 
       \Vow       _   ä:0  Cns:+ :Vow ([%^EA:|%^EX:]) (%^CSH:|%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.] ; 
   [.#.|#|Cns]    _  %^RV: Cns:+ :Vow                  %^CSH:                  %^VHIGH:         [%>|.#.]  ;
          \Vow    _  %^RV: Cns:+ :Vow         (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH:                          ; ! %^RVSH: [%>|.#.]

!!€ sääm^RCi^EA>nmake
!!€ sáám0á0>n

! njaahâđ : njáhhoon 
! njääh^RCo^CLEN^VBACK^RVSH>on (Wrong stem (?) thus commented out)
! njá0hho000>on

"äRV to áá in Illative and Sg3"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  ... for täsni -> táásnán
%^RV:á <=> ä: _  Cns:+ :á   [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:)          %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; 
           ä: _  Cns:+ :Vow                       (%^WG:)  (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ;  !! čevžuin čiävžui RLEN
           ä: _  Cns:+ :Vow               (%^CSH:)                   %^VHIGH: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; 

!!€ hä^RVvdi^EA^WG^RLEN>š
!!€ háávdá000>š

!!€ tä^RVsni^EA^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ táásná000>n

"Vowel lengthening äRV to aa "
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  äigi aaigijd
%^RV:a <=> ä:a _ Cns:+ i: (%^WG:) (%^VBACK:)            %^RLEN:  %> [i:|j] ; ! RV 
           ä:a _ Cns:+ [á|u]  %^WG:                     %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; ! RV  ! exit VHIGH
           ä:a _ Cns:+ [á|u|i|â|a] Cns:* %^WG: %^VBACK: %^RLEN: (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; !! kä%^RVlgâ%^WG%^VBACK%^RLEN%>m
           ä:a _ Cns:+  â Cns:+                         %^RLEN: ;  ! kä%^RVvnâst^WG^VBACK^RLEN%>

!!€ sälkki2>đ>
!!€ salkki>đ>
!!€ sääm^RCi^WG>in
!!€ saam0i0>jn
!!€ sääm^RCi^WG>id
!!€ saam0i0>jd
! riäggás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN>  
! čuággás%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN> 
!!€ stäävi2>đ>
!!€ staavi>đ>
!!€ stäävi2>j>
!!€ staavi>j>
!!€ stäävi2>i3>
!!€ staavi>i>
! XXX i3, not i2. Check!
!!€ stäävi2>jeh>
!!€ stääve>jeh>
!!€ kä^RVvnâst^WG^VBACK^RLEN^SLEN>
!!€ kaavnâst0000>


!! #### á rules

"Root vowel change for á to ä with i in second syllable"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  päävir , já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN>
á:ä <=>    _ [ á:|%^RV:] Cns:* :i (%^SV:) Cns:         %^ÁI: %^WG: (%^CLEN:) [%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:] [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV !! 1) pááppár:päävir
        á: _             Cns:* :i (%^SV:) [l|m|s|n:|r] %^ÁI: %^WG: (%^CLEN:)  %^RLEN:          [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV  !! 2) pááppár:päävir

!rejected, look at this:

!!€ páápp4ár^ÁI^WG^RLEN
!!€ pää0vir000


"Root and stem vowel á:a for verbs"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** 
á:a <=> [Cns|.#.|#] _        Cns:+ u2:u  %>   ;  ! RV ! conflict when \Vow:
        [Cns|.#.]   _        Cns:+ i2: %>    [i|i3:i|Cns]  ; ! RV 
        \Vow:       _ [%^RV:|á:] Cns:+ [u:|u2:] ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:)  [%>|.#.]   ; ! 2st verb pákkuđ: pakkum/h/u
        \Vow:    á: _         Cns:+ [u:|u2:] ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.]   ; ! nááđđu%^VBACK%^RLEN%>m naađđu>m
\Vow: a (%^RV:) Cns:+ _  ([%^WG:|%^CSH:])  (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;  ! SV  !trying this as a phonological rule for -eđ verbs
\Vow: a (%^RV:) Cns:+ :a  ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) %> _ \Vow: ;  ! SUFF  !to prevent conflict

!á%^RVrgu2

!!€ pá^RVkk4u^VBACK>m>
!!€ pa0kku0>m>

!!€ pá^RVkk4u^WG^RLEN>im>
!!€ páá0hu00>im>


!! ### á and uá rules

"Monophthongisation rule uá:o0 part 2: Vowel shortening for uá" 
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for uábbi -> obbijn  čuál%^RCi%^WG%>in tuái4jâl%^CSH%^VBACK%^RVSH%>âm
á:0 <=> u: _ Cns:+ i                     %^WG: %^CLEN: %^SVLOW:                   %> i:  ;  ! RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ :i                    %^WG:                            %^RVSH: %> i:  ;  ! RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ [i|u|â|u2:] (Cns:+) ([%^WG:|%^CSH:|%^CLEN:]) %^VBACK: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.|#] ; !! sopâvetteđ tojâdâm
        u: _ Cns:+  u                                      %^VBACK: %^RVSH:      [%>|.#.] ; !! uáinu
        u: _ Cns:+ i2:i                                                           %> [i|i3:i|Cns]  ;  ! RV 
        u: _ Cns:+ u2:u                ([%^WG: | %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^VBACK:)    %>   ; ! RV  !*


"Monophthongisation rule u:o and root vowel change u:o, special rule for olmooš and contract verbs"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = 
u:o <=>  [.#.|#] _     Cns:+ u:o (%^SV:) [š|ž]  %^WG: (%^SLEN:)  %^SVLOW: [%>|.#.] ; !! ulmu : olmooš, olmožin, carefully with only initial vowel
                 _ á:  Cns:+ u2:u             (%^CLEN:)  (%^RLEN:)         %> ; 
                 _ á:  Cns:+ i2:i                                                             %> [i|i3:i|Cns] ;  ! RV 
     [Cns|.#.|#] _ á:  Cns:+ [i|â|a|á|u] (Cns:+) (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.]  ;  !! oođđim            
                 _ á:0 Cns:+ [i|u|â] (Cns:+) ([%^WG:|%^CSH:|%^CLEN:]) %^VBACK: %^RVSH:       [%>|.#.|#] ; !! sopâvetteđ tojâdâm
                 _ á:0 Cns:*  i                %^WG:        %^CLEN:   %^SVLOW:     %> i:  ; ! RV 
    		     _ á:o Cns:+ Vow: j  %^ÁI: %^WG: ;                                !! puáhháá : poovij ! XXX
                 _ á:0 Cns:+ :i                %^WG:                              %^RVSH:    %> i: ; ! RV 
                 _ á:  Cns:* [i:|i3:i]         %^WG:                             (%^RLEN:)   %> i: ;  ! RV 
                 _ á:  Cns:* u2:u            ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: (%^RLEN:)  [%>|.#.] ; 
             Cns _     Cns:+ e:                                      %^VBACK:               [%>|.#.] ; 

!!€ uái4nu2>đ
!!€ o0inu>đ

!!€ tuállâ^WG^VBACK^RVSH#škyett4
!!€ to00lâ000#škye0t
